Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1 MOTOR VEHICLE DEALERS
44-20-124. Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful and a violation of this part 1 for any manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative:

To willfully fail to perform or cause to be performed any written warranties made with respect to any motor vehicle or parts thereof;

To coerce or attempt to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to perform or allow to be performed any act that could be financially detrimental to the dealer or that would impair the dealer's goodwill or to enter into any agreement with a manufacturer or distributor that would be financially detrimental to the dealer or impair the dealer's goodwill, by threatening to cancel or not renew any franchise between a manufacturer or distributor and the dealer;

To coerce or attempt to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to accept delivery of any motor vehicle, parts or accessories therefor, or any commodities or services that have not been ordered by the dealer;

To cancel or cause to be canceled, directly or indirectly, without just cause, the franchise of any motor vehicle dealer, and the nonrenewal of a franchise or selling agreement without just cause is a violation of this subsection (1)(d) and shall constitute an unfair cancellation.

As used in this subsection (1)(d), "just cause" shall be determined in the context of all circumstances surrounding the cancellation or nonrenewal, including but not limited to:

The amount of business transacted by the motor vehicle dealer;

The investments necessarily made and obligations incurred by the motor vehicle dealer, including but not limited to goodwill, in the performance of its duties under the franchise agreement, together with the duration and permanency of the investments and obligations;

The potential for harm to consumers as a result of disruption of the business of the motor vehicle dealer;

The motor vehicle dealer's failure to provide adequate service of facilities, equipment, parts, and qualified service personnel;

The motor vehicle dealer's failure to perform warranty work on behalf of the manufacturer, subject to reimbursement by the manufacturer; and

The motor vehicle dealer's failure to substantially comply, in good faith, with requirements of the franchise that are determined to be reasonable and material.

The following conduct by a motor vehicle dealer shall constitute just cause for termination without consideration of other factors:

Conviction of, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony;

A continuing pattern of fraudulent conduct against the manufacturer or consumers; or

Continuing failure to operate for ten days or longer.

To withhold, reduce, or delay unreasonably or without just cause delivery of motor vehicles, motor vehicle parts and accessories, commodities, or money due motor vehicle dealers for warranty work done by any motor vehicle dealer;

To withhold, reduce, or delay unreasonably or without just cause services contracted for by motor vehicle dealers;

To coerce any motor vehicle dealer to provide installment financing with a specified financial institution;

To violate any duty imposed by, or fail to comply with, any provision of section 44-20-125, 44-20-126, or 44-20-127;

To fail to provide to the motor vehicle dealer, within twenty days after receipt of a notice of intent from a motor vehicle dealer, the list of documents and information necessary to approve the sale or transfer of the ownership of a dealership by sale of the business or by stock transfer or the change in executive management of the dealership;

To fail to confirm within twenty days after receipt of all documents and information listed in subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section that the documentation and information has been received;

To refuse to approve, unreasonably, the sale or transfer of the ownership of a dealership by sale of the business or by stock transfer within sixty days after the manufacturer has received all documents and information necessary to approve the sale or transfer of ownership, or to refuse to approve, unreasonably, the change in executive management of the dealership within sixty days after the manufacturer has received all information necessary to approve the change in management; except that nothing in this part 1 shall authorize the sale, transfer, or assignment of a franchise or a change of the principal operator without the approval of the manufacturer or distributor unless the manufacturer or distributor fails to send notice of the disapproval within sixty days after receiving all documents and information necessary to approve the sale or transfer of ownership; or

To condition the sale, transfer, relocation, or renewal of a franchise agreement, or to condition sales, services, parts, or finance incentives, upon site control or an agreement to renovate or make improvements to a facility; except that voluntary acceptance of the conditions by the dealer shall not constitute a violation;

To fail or refuse to offer to its same line-make franchised dealers all models manufactured for that line-make except as a result of a strike or labor difficulty, lack of manufacturing capacity, shortage of materials, freight embargo, or other cause over which the manufacturer has no control; or
(j) (I) (A) To fail or refuse to offer to its same line-make franchised dealers all models manufactured for that line-make except as a result of a strike or labor difficulty, lack of manufacturing capacity, shortage of materials, freight embargo, or other cause over which the manufacturer has no control; or

To require a dealer to pay an unreasonable fee, purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other materials, or comply with unreasonable training or facilities requirements as a prerequisite to receiving any particular model of that same line-make. For purposes of this subsection (1)(j)(I)(B), reasonableness shall be judged based on the circumstances of the individual dealer and the conditions of the market served by the dealer.

This subsection (1)(j) shall not apply to manufacturers of recreational vehicles nor to manufacturers of vehicles with a passenger capacity of thirty-two or more.

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to refrain from participation in the management of, investment in, or acquisition of any other line-make of new motor vehicles or related products; except that this subsection (1)(k) shall not apply unless the motor vehicle dealer:

Maintains a reasonable line of credit for each make or line of new motor vehicles;

Remains in compliance with reasonable capital standards and reasonable facilities requirements specified by the manufacturer; except that "reasonable facilities requirements" shall not include a requirement that a motor vehicle dealer establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space; and

Provides written notice to the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer's representative, no less than ninety days prior to the dealer's intent to participate in the management of, investment in, or acquisition of another line-make of new motor vehicles or related products;

To fail to pay to a motor vehicle dealer, within ninety days after the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise, all of the following:

The dealer cost, plus any charges made by the manufacturer for distribution, delivery, and taxes, less all allowances paid or credited to the motor vehicle dealer by the manufacturer, of unused, undamaged, and unsold motor vehicles in the motor vehicle dealer's inventory that were acquired from the manufacturer or from another motor vehicle dealer of the same line-make in the ordinary course of business within the previous twelve months;

The dealer cost, less all allowances paid or credited to the motor vehicle dealer by the manufacturer, for all unused, undamaged, and unsold supplies, parts, and accessories in original packaging and listed in the manufacturer's current parts catalog;

The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the motor vehicle dealer and bearing a common name, trade name, or trademark of the manufacturer if acquisition of the sign was required by the manufacturer;

The fair market value of all special tools and equipment that were acquired from the manufacturer or from sources approved and required by the manufacturer and that are in good and usable condition, excluding normal wear and tear; and

The cost of transporting, handling, packing, and loading the motor vehicles, supplies, parts, accessories, signs, special tools, equipment, and furnishings described in this subsection (1)(l).

This subsection (1)(l) shall only apply to manufacturers of recreational vehicles in cases where the manufacturer terminates, cancels, or fails to renew the recreational vehicle dealer franchise; and this subsection (1)(l) shall not apply to manufacturers of vehicles with a passenger capacity of thirty-two or more.

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to close or change the location of the motor vehicle dealer, or to make any substantial alterations to the dealer premises or facilities when doing so would be unreasonable or without written assurance of a sufficient supply of motor vehicles so as to justify the changes, in light of the current market and economic conditions;

To authorize or permit a person to perform warranty service repairs on motor vehicles unless the person is:

A motor vehicle dealer with whom the manufacturer has entered into a franchise agreement for the sale and service of the manufacturer's motor vehicles; or

A person or government entity that has purchased new motor vehicles pursuant to a manufacturer's fleet discount program and is performing the warranty service repairs only on vehicles owned by the person or entity.

This subsection (1)(n) shall not apply to manufacturers of recreational vehicles nor to manufacturers of vehicles with a passenger capacity of thirty-two or more.

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to prospectively agree to a release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel that would relieve any person of a duty or liability imposed under this article 20 except in settlement of a bona fide dispute;

To discriminate between or refuse to offer to its same line-make franchised dealers all models manufactured for that line-make based upon unreasonable sales and service standards;

To fail to make practically available any incentive, rebate, bonus, or other similar benefit to a motor vehicle dealer that is offered to another motor vehicle dealer of the same line-make within this state;

To fail to pay to a motor vehicle dealer:

Within ninety days after the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise for the failure of a dealer to meet performance sales and service obligations or after the termination, elimination, or cessation of a line-make, the cost of the lease for the facilities used for the franchise or line-make for the unexpired term of the lease, not to exceed one year; except that:

If the motor vehicle dealer owns the facilities, the value of renting the facilities for one year, prorated for each line-make based upon total sales volume for the previous twelve months before the involuntary termination;

If the dealer sells recreational vehicles and a subsequent manufacturer or distributor that manufactures or distributes recreational vehicles replaces any portion of the vacated facilities, the lease or rental value shall be prorated on a monthly basis unless the dealer sells motor vehicles that are not recreational vehicles;

Nothing in this subsection (1)(r)(I) shall be construed to limit the application of subsection (1)(d) of this section;

Within ninety days after the termination, elimination, or cessation of a line-make or the termination of a franchise due to the insolvency of the manufacturer or distributor, the fair market value of the motor vehicle dealer's goodwill for the line-make as of the date the manufacturer or distributor announces the action that results in the termination, elimination, or cessation, not including any amounts paid under subsections (1)(l)(I)(A) to (1)(l)(I)(E) of this section;

To condition a franchise agreement on improvements to a facility unless reasonably required by the technology of a motor vehicle being sold at the facility;

To sell or offer for sale a low-speed electric vehicle, as defined by section 42-1-102, for use on a roadway unless the vehicle complies with part 2 of article 4 of title 42;

To charge back, deny motor vehicle allocation, withhold payments, or take other actions against a motor vehicle dealer if a motor vehicle sold by the motor vehicle dealer is exported from Colorado unless the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative proves that the motor vehicle dealer knew or reasonably should have known a motor vehicle was intended to be exported, which shall operate as a rebuttable presumption that the motor vehicle dealer did not have the knowledge;

Within ninety days after the termination, elimination, or cessation of a line-make or the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative, for any reason other than that the motor vehicle dealer commits fraud, makes a misrepresentation, or commits any other crime within the scope of the franchise agreement or in the operation of the dealership, to fail to reimburse a motor vehicle dealer for the cost depreciated by five percent per year of any upgrades or alterations to the motor vehicle dealer's facilities required by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative within the previous five years;

To fail to notify a motor vehicle dealer at least ninety days before the following and to provide the specific reasons for the following:

Directly or indirectly terminating, canceling, or not renewing a franchise agreement; or

Modifying, replacing, or attempting to modify or replace the franchise or selling agreement of a motor vehicle dealer, including a change in the dealer's geographic area upon which sales or service performance is measured, if the modification would substantially and adversely alter the rights or obligations of the dealer under the current franchise or selling agreement or would substantially impair the sales or service obligations or the dealer's investment;

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce a motor vehicle dealer to substantially alter a facility or premises if:

The facility or premises has been altered within the last ten years at a cost of more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars and the alteration was required and approved by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative unless subsection (1)(x)(II) of this section applies to the dealer; except that this subsection (1)(x) does not apply to improvements made to comply with health or safety laws, to improvements made to accommodate the technology requirements necessary to sell or service a line-make, to technological improvements related to electric, automated, compressed natural gas, and fuel-cell motor vehicles, or to improvements made to install or upgrade electric vehicle charging equipment; or

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(x)(II) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The motor vehicle dealer sells only motorcycles or motorcycles and powersports vehicles, the facility or premises has been altered within the last ten years at a cost of more than twenty-five thousand dollars, and the alteration was required and approved by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative; except that this subsection (1)(x) does not apply to improvements made to comply with health or safety laws, to improvements made to accommodate the technology requirements necessary to sell or service a line-make, to technological improvements related to electric, automated, compressed natural gas, and fuel-cell motorcycles and powersports vehicles, or to improvements made to install or upgrade electric vehicle charging equipment;

(II)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(x)(II) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

(A) Except as provided in subsection (1)(x)(II)(B) of this section, the motor vehicle dealer: Sells only motorcycles, autocycles, motorcycles and autocycles, or motorcycles, autocycles, and powersports vehicles; the facility or premises has been altered within the last ten years at a cost of more than twenty-five thousand dollars; and the alteration was required and approved by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

(B) This subsection (1)(x)(II) does not apply to improvements made to comply with health or safety laws; to improvements made to accommodate the technology requirements necessary to sell or service a line-make; to technological improvements related to electric, automated, compressed natural gas, and fuel-cell motorcycles and powersports vehicles; or to improvements made to install or upgrade electric vehicle charging equipment.

To sell or offer to sell new motor vehicles to a franchised motor vehicle dealer with whom the manufacturer has a franchise agreement at a lower actual price than the actual price offered to any other motor vehicle dealer with whom the manufacturer has a franchise agreement for the same motor vehicle similarly equipped; except that this subsection (1)(y) does not apply to:

Resale to any government;

Donation or use by the dealer in a driver education program; or

A price change made in the ordinary course of business if made available to all motor vehicle dealers when the price changes.

This subsection (1)(y) does not prohibit a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative from offering incentive programs, sales-promotion plans, or other discounts if the incentives or discounts are reasonably available to all motor vehicle dealers with whom the manufacturer has a franchise agreement.

To require a motor vehicle dealer to grant a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative the following or to enforce the following if the exercise of the contractual right would stop the transfer of the motor vehicle dealer ownership from an owner to an immediate family member of the owner:

A right of first refusal to purchase the motor vehicle dealer; or

An option to purchase the motor vehicle dealer; and

(I) To use an unreasonable, arbitrary, or unfair performance standard in determining a motor vehicle dealer's compliance with a franchise agreement;

(II) To fail to communicate, upon the request of the dealer, any performance standard in a clear and concise writing to a motor vehicle dealer before applying the standard to the motor vehicle dealer.

It is unlawful for any person to act as a motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer representative, used motor vehicle dealer, buyer agent, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, business disposer, or motor vehicle salesperson unless the person has been duly licensed under this part 1, except for:

Persons exempt from licensure as a manufacturer under section 44-20-102 (14); however, manufacturers exempt from licensing shall comply with all other applicable requirements for manufacturers, including those pertaining to vehicle identification numbers and manufacturers' statements of origin; and

Business owners selling a vehicle if the vehicle has been owned for more than one year, the vehicle has been used exclusively for business purposes, the vehicle is titled in the name of the business, all applicable taxes related to the vehicle have been paid, and the total number of vehicles sold by a business owner over a two-year period does not exceed twenty vehicles.

It is unlawful and a violation of this part 1 for a buyer's agent to engage in the following:

To make a material misstatement in an application for a license;

To willfully fail to perform or cause to be performed any written agreement with respect to any motor vehicle or parts thereof;

To defraud any buyer, seller, motor vehicle salesperson, or financial institution;

To intentionally enter into a financial agreement with a seller of a motor vehicle for the buyer agent's own benefit;

To coerce any motor vehicle dealer into providing installment financing with a specified financial institution.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 72, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(2) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2806, § 9, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(x)(II) amended, (HB 22-1043), ch. 361, p. 2589, § 32, effective January 1, 2023.

44-20-125. New, reopened, or relocated dealer - notice required - grounds for refusal of dealer license - definitions - rules.

No manufacturer shall establish an additional motor vehicle dealer, reopen a previously existing motor vehicle dealer, or authorize an existing motor vehicle dealer to relocate without first providing at least sixty days' notice to all of its franchised dealers within whose relevant market area the new, reopened, or relocated dealer would be located. The notice must state:

The specific location at which the additional, reopened, or relocated motor vehicle dealer will be established;

The date on or after which the manufacturer intends to be engaged in business with the additional, reopened, or relocated motor vehicle dealer at the proposed location; and

The identity of all motor vehicle dealers who are franchised to sell the same line-make of vehicles with licensed locations in the relevant market area where the additional, reopened, or relocated motor vehicle dealer is proposed to be located.

A manufacturer shall approve or disapprove of a motor vehicle dealer facility's initial site location, relocation, or reopening request within sixty days after the request or after sending the notice required by subsection (1) of this section to all of its franchised dealers, whichever is later.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

The relocation of an existing dealer within two miles of its current location; or

The establishment of a replacement dealer, within two years, either at the former location or within two miles of the former location.

As used in this section:

"Manufacturer" means a motor vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

"Relevant market area" means the greater of the following:

The geographic area of responsibility defined in the franchise agreement of an existing dealer; or

The geographic area within a radius of ten miles of any existing dealer of the same line-make of vehicle as the proposed additional motor vehicle dealer.

An existing motor vehicle dealer adversely affected by a reopening or relocation of an existing same line-make motor vehicle dealer or the addition of a same line-make motor vehicle dealer may, within ninety days after receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section, file a legal action in a district court of competent jurisdiction or file an administrative complaint with the executive director to prevent or enjoin the relocation, reopening, or addition of the proposed motor vehicle dealer. An existing motor vehicle dealer is adversely impacted if:

(I) The dealer is located within the relevant market area of the proposed relocated, reopened, or additional dealership described in the notice required in subsection (1) of this section; or

(II) The existing dealer or dealers of the same line-make show that, during any twelve-month period of the thirty-six months preceding the receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section, the dealer or dealers, or a dealer's predecessor, made at least twenty-five percent of the dealer's retail sales of new motor vehicles to persons whose addresses are located within ten miles of the location of the proposed relocated, reopened, or additional dealership.

The executive director shall refer a complaint filed under this section to an administrative law judge with the office of administrative courts for final agency action.

In any court or administrative action, the manufacturer has the burden of proof on each of the following issues:

The change in population;

The relevant vehicle buyer profiles;

The relevant historical new motor vehicle registrations for the line-make of vehicles versus the manufacturer's actual competitors in the relevant market area;

Whether the opening of the proposed additional, reopened, or relocated motor vehicle dealer is materially beneficial to the public interest or the consumers in the relevant market area;

Whether the motor vehicle dealers of the same line-make in the relevant market area are providing adequate representation and convenient customer care, including the adequacy of sales and service facilities, equipment, parts, and qualified service personnel, for motor vehicles of the same line-make in the relevant market area;

The reasonably expected market penetration of the line-make, given the factors affecting penetration; and

Whether the additional, reopened, or relocated dealership is reasonable and justifiable based on expected economic and market conditions within the relevant market area.

In any court or administrative action, the motor vehicle dealer has the burden of proof on each of the following issues:

Whether the manufacturer has engaged in any action or omission that, directly or indirectly, denied the existing motor vehicle dealer of the same line-make the opportunity for reasonable growth or market expansion;

Whether the manufacturer has coerced or attempted to coerce any existing motor vehicle dealer or dealers into consenting to additional or relocated franchises of the same line-make in the community or territory or relevant market area; and

The size and permanency of the investment of and obligations incurred by the existing motor vehicle dealers of the same line-make located in the relevant market area.

In a legal or administrative action challenging the relocating, reopening, or addition of a motor vehicle dealer, the district court or administrative law judge shall make a determination of whether the relocation, reopening, or addition of a motor vehicle dealer is, based on the factors identified in subsections (5)(c) and (5)(d) of this section:

In the public interest; and

Fair and equitable to the existing motor vehicle dealers.

The district court or the executive director shall deny any proposed relocating, reopening, or addition of a motor vehicle dealer unless the manufacturer shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the existing motor vehicle dealer or dealers of the same line-make in the relevant market area of the proposed dealership are not providing adequate representation of the line-make motor vehicles. A determination to deny, prevent, or enjoin the relocating, reopening, or addition of a motor vehicle dealer is effective for at least eighteen months.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 79, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-120.3 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-126. Independent control of dealer - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no manufacturer shall own, operate, or control any motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer in Colorado.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the following activities are not prohibited:

Except as provided in subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section, operation of a dealer for a temporary period, not to exceed twelve months, during the transition from one owner or operator to another independent owner or operator; except that the executive director may extend the period, not to exceed twenty-four months, upon showing by the manufacturer or distributor of the need to operate the dealership for such time to achieve a transition from an owner or operator to another independent third-party owner or operator;

Operation of a dealer that sells recreational vehicles for not more than eighteen months during the transition from one owner or operator to another independent owner or operator;

Ownership or control of a dealer while the dealer is being sold under a bona fide contract or purchase option to the operator of the dealer;

Participation in the ownership of the dealer solely for the purpose of providing financing or a capital loan that will enable the dealer to become the majority owner of the dealer in less than seven years;

Operation of a motor vehicle dealer if the manufacturer has no other dealers of the same line-make in this state; or

Repealed.

Ownership, operation, or control of one or more motor vehicle dealers if the manufacturer manufactures only electric vehicles and has no franchised dealers of the same line-make in this state.

As used in this section:

"Control" means to possess, directly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise; except that "control" does not include the relationship between a manufacturer and a motor vehicle dealer under a franchise agreement.

"Manufacturer" means a motor vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

"Operate" means to directly or indirectly manage a motor vehicle dealer.

"Own" means to hold any beneficial ownership interest of one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealer, whether as a shareholder, partner, limited liability company member, or otherwise. To "hold" an ownership interest means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership interest, either directly or through a fiduciary or agent.

This section shall not apply to manufacturers of vehicles with a passenger capacity of thirty-two or more.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 82, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(2)(d) amended, (2)(e) and (2)(f) repealed, and (2)(g) added, (SB 20-167), ch. 71, p. 302, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-120.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-127. Successor under existing franchise agreement - duties of manufacturer.

If a licensed motor vehicle dealer under franchise by a manufacturer dies or becomes incapacitated, the manufacturer shall act in good faith to allow a successor, which may include a family member, designated by the deceased or incapacitated motor vehicle dealer to succeed to ownership and operation of the dealer under the existing franchise agreement if:

Within ninety days after the motor vehicle dealer's death or incapacity, the designated successor gives the manufacturer written notice of an intent to succeed to the rights of the deceased or incapacitated motor vehicle dealer in the franchise agreement;

The designated successor agrees to be bound by all of the terms and conditions of the existing franchise agreement; and

The designated successor meets the criteria generally applied by the manufacturer in qualifying motor vehicle dealers.

A manufacturer may refuse to honor the existing franchise agreement with the designated successor only for good cause. The manufacturer may request in writing from a designated successor the personal and financial data that is reasonably necessary to determine whether the existing franchise agreement should be honored, and the designated successor shall supply the data promptly upon request.

If a manufacturer believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the requested succession, the manufacturer shall send the designated successor, by certified or overnight mail, notice of its refusal to approve the succession within sixty days after the later of:

Receipt of the notice of the designated successor's intent to succeed the motor vehicle dealer in the ownership and operation of the dealer; or

The receipt of the requested personal and financial data.

Failure to serve the notice pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be considered approval of the designated successor, and the franchise agreement is considered amended to reflect the approval of the succession the day following the last day of the notice period specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

If the manufacturer gives notice of refusal to approve the succession, the notice shall state the specific grounds for the refusal and shall state that the franchise agreement shall be discontinued not less than ninety days after the date the notice of refusal is served unless the proposed successor files an action in the district court to enjoin the action.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a motor vehicle dealer from designating a person as the successor in advance, by written instrument filed with the manufacturer. If the motor vehicle dealer files such an instrument, that instrument governs the succession rights to the management and operation of the dealer subject to the designated successor satisfying the manufacturer's qualification requirements as described in this section.

This section shall not apply to manufacturers of vehicles with a passenger capacity of thirty-two or more.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 83, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-120.7 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-128. Penalty.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who willfully violates this part 1 or who willfully commits any offense in this part 1 declared to be unlawful commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person who willfully violates section 44-20-124 (2) by acting as a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative without proper authorization commits a petty offense.

Any person who willfully violates section 44-20-124 (2) by acting as a motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, used motor vehicle dealer, buyer agent, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, business disposer, or motor vehicle salesperson without proper authorization commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 84, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2806, § 10, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3328, § 787, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-121 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-129. Fines - disposition - unlicensed sales.

Of any fine collected for a violation of section 44-20-124 (2), half shall be awarded to the law enforcement agency that investigated and issued the citation for the violation and half shall be credited to the auto dealers license fund created in section 44-20-133.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 85, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-121.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-130. Drafts not honored for payment - penalties.

If a motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, or used motor vehicle dealer issues a draft or check to a motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, used motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle auction house, or consignor and fails to honor the draft or check, then the license of the licensee shall be subject to suspension pursuant to section 44-20-104 (3)(e)(I). The license suspension shall be effective upon the date of any final decision against the licensee based upon the unpaid draft or check. A licensee whose license has been suspended pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1) shall not be eligible for reinstatement of the license and shall not be eligible to apply for any other license issued under this part 1 unless it is demonstrated to the board that the unpaid draft or check has been paid in full and that any fine imposed on the licensee pursuant to subsection (2) of this section has been paid in full.

Any motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, or used motor vehicle dealer that issues a draft or check to a motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, used motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle auction house, or consignor and who fails to honor the draft or check, causing loss to a third party, commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars. Any fine collected for a violation of this subsection (2) shall be awarded to the law enforcement agency that investigated and issued the citation for the violation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 85, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-121.6 as it existed prior to 2018.